Washington statutes.
RCW 41.80.050

Rights of employees.

Except as may be specifically limited by this chapter, employees shall have the right to self-organization, to form, join, or assist employee organizations, and to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing for the purpose of collective bargaining free from interference, restraint, or coercion. Employees shall also have the right to refrain from any or all such activities.

[ 2019 c 230 s 15; 2002 c 354 s 306.]